Missouri, session 2026, SB1362.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 196.025, 196.050, and 196.075, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 196.025, 196.050, and 196.075, to read as
follows:
196.025. 1. Any person who violates any of the
provisions of section 196.015 shall, on conviction, be
adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor, and punished by a fine of
[not more than] one thousand dollars for each incident or
for each prohibited product offered for sale in Missouri, or
imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
2. No person shall be subject to the penalties of
subsection 1 of this section for having violated subdivision
(1) or (3) of section [196.015(1) or 196.015(3)] 196.015, if
he establishes a guaranty or undertaking signed by the
person from whom he purchased the food, drug, device, or
cosmetic; if a resident of this state, that the food, drug,
device, or cosmetic is not adulterated or misbranded within
the meaning of sections 196.010 to 196.120, designating it,
or, if a nonresident of this state residing in the United
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1362 2
States, or a resident of this state engaged in interstate
commerce with reference to the product involved, that the
food, drug, device, or cosmetic is not adulterated or
misbranded within the meaning of an act of congress entitled
"An act to prohibit the movement in interstate commerce of
adulterated and misbranded food, drugs, devices, and
cosmetics, and for other purposes" approved June 25, 1938,
and the supplements and amendments thereto.
3. No publisher, radio broadcast licensee, or agency
or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except
the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the
article to which a false advertisement relates shall be
liable under this section by reason of the dissemination by
him of such false advertisement, unless he has refused, on
the request of the department of health and senior services
to furnish the said department the name and post-office
address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller, or
advertising agency, residing in the state of Missouri, or in
the United States, who caused him to disseminate such
advertisement.
196.050. Unless otherwise provided for in sections
196.010 to 196.120, in no event shall the said department of
health and senior services prescribe or promulgate any
regulation fixing or establishing any definitions or
standards which are more rigid or more stringent than those
prescribed by the federal act applying to any commodity
covered by sections 196.010 to 196.120 and if any product or
commodity covered by said sections shall comply with the
definitions and standards prescribed by the federal act for
such product or commodity, such product or commodity shall
be deemed in all respects to comply with sections 196.010 to
196.120.

SB 1362 3
196.075. 1. A food shall be deemed to be misbranded:
(1) If its labeling is false or misleading in any
particular;
(2) If it is offered for sale under the name of
another food;
(3) If it is an imitation of another food, unless its
label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the
word, "imitation", and, immediately thereafter, the name of
the food imitated;
(4) If its container is so made, formed or filled as
to be misleading;
(5) If in package form, unless it bears a label
containing:
(a) The name and place of business of the
manufacturer, packer or distributor;
(b) An accurate statement of the quantity of the
contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count;
provided, that under [clause (b) of] this [subdivision]
paragraph reasonable variations shall be permitted, and
exemptions as to small packages shall be established, by
regulations prescribed by the department of health and
senior services;
(6) If any word, statement, or other information
required by or under authority of sections 196.010 to
196.120 to appear on the label or labeling is not
prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as
compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices,
in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to
be read and understood by the ordinary individual under
customary conditions of purchase and use;
(7) If it purports to be or is represented as a food
for which a definition and standard of identity has been

SB 1362 4
prescribed by regulations as provided by section 196.050,
unless it conforms to such definition and standard, and its
label bears the name of the food specified in the definition
and standard, and, insofar as may be required by such
regulations, the common names of optional ingredients, other
than spices, flavoring, and coloring, present in such food;
(8) If it purports to be or is represented as:
(a) A food for which a standard of quality has been
prescribed by regulations as provided by section 196.050 and
its quality falls below such standard unless its label
bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify,
a statement that it falls below such standard;
(b) A food for which a standard or standards of fill
of container have been prescribed by regulation as provided
by section 196.050, and it falls below the standard of fill
of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in
such manner and form as such regulations specify, a
statement that it falls below such standard;
(9) If it is not subject to the provisions of
subdivision (7) of this section, unless it bears labeling
clearly giving:
(a) The common or usual name of the food, if any there
be; and
(b) In case it is fabricated from two or more
ingredients, the common or usual name of each such
ingredient, except that spices, flavorings, and colorings,
other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices,
flavorings, and colorings, without naming each; provided,
that, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of
[paragraph (b) of] this [subdivision] paragraph is
impractical or results in deception or unfair competition,
exemptions shall be established by regulations promulgated

SB 1362 5
by the department of health and senior services; provided
further, that the requirements of [paragraph (b) of] this
[subdivision] paragraph shall not apply to any carbonated
beverage the ingredients of which have been fully and
correctly disclosed, to the extent prescribed by [said] this
paragraph [(b)] to the department of health and senior
services in an affidavit;
(10) If it purports to be or is represented for
special dietary uses, unless its label bears such
information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other
dietary properties as the department of health and senior
services determines to be, and by regulations prescribed, as
necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its
value for such uses;
(11) If it bears or contains any artificial flavoring,
coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it bears labeling
stating that fact; provided, that to the extent that
compliance with the requirements of this subdivision is
impracticable, exemptions shall be established by
regulations promulgated by the department of health and
senior services; and provided further, that this subdivision
[(11)] shall not apply to artificial coloring in butter,
cheese or ice cream;
(12) If it bears or contains any bioengineered
substance, as such term is defined in 7 CFR 66.1, or
advertises or claims to contain natural flavoring, as such
term is defined in 21 CFR 101.22, unless it bears labeling
containing a website link, quick-response code, or similar
resource identifying the bioengineered substance or specific
natural flavoring, notwithstanding the provisions of
paragraph (b) of subdivision (9) of this subsection to the
contrary;

SB 1362 6
(13) If it is a fruit or vegetable bearing or
containing any edible coating, including any wax, resin,
ester, or other compound regulated by 21 CFR 172, unless the
100 label of such food or any display placed at the point of
101 sale for such food contains a disclosure of such coating or
102 a website link, quick-response code, or similar resource
103 directs the consumer to such disclosure;
104 (14) If it contains, in whole or in part, cell-
105 cultivated, lab-grown, or insect-based meat or meat
106 alternatives, unless such product is clearly labeled on the
107 front of the package, in at least fifteen-point uniform bold
108 type, "LAB-CREATED" or "INSECT-BASED" or a comparable
109 qualifier determined by the department in rule. A product
110 package determined to be in compliance with comparable
111 regulations promulgated by the department of agriculture
112 implementing the provisions of subdivision (7) of section
113 265.494 shall satisfy the requirements of this subdivision;
114 or
115 (15) If it contains, in whole or in part, meat food
116 products derived from an animal vaccinated with a messenger
117 ribonucleic acid-based vaccine, unless the product packaging
118 states, in at least fifteen-point uniform bold type, "MRNA
119 VACCINATED".
120 2. The department is hereby directed to promulgate
121 regulations exempting from any labeling requirement of
122 sections 196.010 to 196.120 small open containers of fresh
123 fruits and vegetables and food which is, in accordance with
124 the practice of the trade, to be processed, labeled, or
125 repacked in substantial quantities at establishments other
126 than those where originally processed or packed, on
127 condition that such food is not adulterated or misbranded

SB 1362 7
128 under the provisions of said sections upon removal from such
129 processing, labeling or repackaging establishment.
✓